Louisiana, session 2026, HB1231.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:450.8(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§450.8. Continuous glucose monitors; Medicaid coverage
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, the Louisiana
Medicaid program shall provide coverage for a continuous glucose monitor for the
treatment of an enrollee who has one of the following conditions:
(1) Any type of diabetes, including but not limited to gestational diabetes,
requiring use with the use of insulin more than two times daily or evidence of level
2 or level 3 hypoglycemia.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.